apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
<pardef n="गर__v">
<e>       <p><l>्छ</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्छ</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्यो</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>्नेछ</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:नेछ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्नेछन्</l>                             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/><s n="tam:नेछन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्छिन्</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:छिन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्छन्</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:छन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्ला</l>                                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="tam:ला"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्लान्</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:लान्"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="हु__v">
	<e>	<p><l>हुँ</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>हौं</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>हौ</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>हो</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>हुन</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>हुन</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>थिए</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>थियो</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>थिईन्</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p>	</e>

	<e>	<p><l>छु</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="ger"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>छौं</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="ger"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>छौं</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="ger"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sp"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>छ</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="ger"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>छिन्</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="ger"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p>	</e>
	<e>	<p><l>छन्</l>				<r>हु<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="ger"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>	</e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="छ__vbhaver">
	<e>       <p><l></l>                           <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e>       <p><l>न्</l>                           <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e>       <p><l>थियो</l>                         <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="समाप्त_used_as__v">
<e>       <p><l><b/>गर्छ</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l><b/>गर्छ</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l><b/>गर्यो</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l><b/>गरे</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="prsubj__prn">
<e>       <p><l>म</l>                                  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>तिमी</l>                                <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>उ</l>                                 <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>उनी</l>                                <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>त्यो</l>                                 <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हामी</l>                                 <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>तिनीहरु</l>                               <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="खा/नु__v">
<e>       <p><l>नु</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छु</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छौं</l>                                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छौ</l>                                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>छौ</l>                                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छ</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छिन</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छन</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>दै</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="खेल्/नु__v">
<e>       <p><l>नु</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>छु</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>छौं</l>                                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>छौ</l>                                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>छौ</l>                                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>छ</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>छिन</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>छन</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>दै</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="नमस्कार__ij">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!--

<e>       <i></i><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="देख"><i>देख</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="हेर"><i>हेर</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बिगार"><i>बिगार</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="समाप्त पार"><i>समाप्त</i><par n="समाप्त_used_as__v"/></e>
<e lm="गर्"><i>गर्</i><par n="खा/नु__v"/></e>
<e lm="खेल्नु"><i>खेल्</i><par n="खेल्/नु__v"/></e>
<e lm="बस्नु"><i>बस्</i><par n="खेल्/नु__v"/></e>
<e lm="भन"><i>भन</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="खानु"><i>खा</i><par n="खा/नु__v"/></e>
<e lm="सुत्नु"><i>सुत्</i><par n="खा/नु__v"/></e>
<e lm="हिँड"><i>हिँड</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="उठ"><i>उठ</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बस"><i>बस</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="लेख"><i>लेख</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="पढ"><i>पढ</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बोल"><i>बोल</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="सोध"><i>सोध</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="माग"><i>माग</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="डुल"><i>डुल</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="काट"><i>काट</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="मार"><i>मार</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="पिट"><i>पिट</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="चोर"><i>चोर</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="च्यात"><i>च्यात</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="फ्याल"><i>फ्याल</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="सुन"><i>सुन</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="गन"><i>गन</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="चढ"><i>चढ</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="खोल"><i>खोल</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बाँड"><i>बाँड</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बाँड"><i>चुँँड</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बाँड"><i>दगुर</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बाँड"><i>पछार</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="हु"><par n="हु__v"/></e>
<e lm="छ"><i>छ</i><par n="छ__vbhaver"/></e>
<e lm="नमस्कार"><i>नमस्कार</i><par n="नमस्कार__ij"/></e>
